Massachusetts, session 194th, H5503.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation project number 609108
for the construction of a bike path bridge over state highway route 140 that provides a crossing
and links the existing bike path of the North Central Pathway in the City of Gardner, shall be
designated and known as the Representative Robert L. Rice, Jr. Bridge, in honor and recognition
of former State Representative Robert L. Rice, Jr.
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall erect a suitable
marker bearing the designation in compliance with the standards of the department.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1